Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-316
Violation of custody; penalty.

(1) Any person, including a natural or foster parent, who, knowing that he has no legal right to do so or, heedless in that regard, takes or entices any child under the age of eighteen years from the custody of its parent having legal custody, guardian, or other lawful custodian commits the offense of violation of custody.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, violation of custody is a Class II misdemeanor.

(3) Violation of custody in contravention of an order of any district or juvenile court of this state granting the custody of a child under the age of eighteen years to any person, agency, or institution, with the intent to deprive the lawful custodian of the custody of such child, is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 31.